tests/numerals/numerals.yaml
  "px numbers in dat":
    1<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "1-енә"
    2<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "2-сенә"
    3<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "3-енә"
    4<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "4-енә"
    5<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "5-енә"
    6<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "6-сына"
    7<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "7-сенә"
    8<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "8-енә"
    9<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "9-ына"
    10<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "10-ына"
    11<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "11-енә"
    12<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "12-сенә"
    13<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "13-енә"
    14<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "14-енә"
    15<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "15-енә"
    16<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "16-сына"
    17<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "17-сенә"
    18<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "18-енә"
    19<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "19-ына"
    20<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "20-сына"
    21<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "21-енә"
    22<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "22-сенә"
    23<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "23-енә"
    24<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "24-енә"
    25<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "25-енә"
    26<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "26-сына"
    27<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "27-сенә"
    28<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "28-енә"
    29<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "29-ына"
    30<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "30-ына"
    31<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "31-енә"
    32<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "32-сенә"
    33<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "33-енә"
    34<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "34-енә"
    35<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "35-енә"
    36<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "36-сына"
    37<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "37-сенә"
    38<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "38-енә"
    39<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "39-ына"
    40<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "40-ына"
    41<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "41-енә"
    42<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "42-сенә"
    43<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "43-енә"
    44<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "44-енә"
    45<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "45-енә"
    46<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "46-сына"
    47<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "47-сенә"
    48<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "48-енә"
    49<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "49-ына"
    50<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "50-енә"
    51<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "51-енә"
    52<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "52-сенә"
    53<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "53-енә"
    54<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "54-енә"
    55<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "55-енә"
    56<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "56-сына"
    57<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "57-сенә"
    58<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "58-енә"
    59<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "59-ына"
    60<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "60-ына"
    61<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "61-енә"
    62<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "62-сенә"
    63<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "63-енә"
    64<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "64-енә"
    65<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "65-енә"
    66<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "66-сына"
    67<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "67-сенә"
    68<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "68-енә"
    69<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "69-ына"
    70<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "70-енә"
    71<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "71-енә"
    72<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "72-сенә"
    73<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "73-енә"
    74<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "74-енә"
    75<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "75-енә"
    76<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "76-сына"
    77<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "77-сенә"
    78<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "78-енә"
    79<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "79-ына"
    80<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "80-енә"
    81<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "81-енә"
    82<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "82-сенә"
    83<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "83-енә"
    84<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "84-енә"
    85<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "85-енә"
    86<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "86-сына"
    87<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "87-сенә"
    88<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "88-енә"
    89<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "89-ына"
    90<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "90-ына"
    91<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "91-енә"
    92<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "92-сенә"
    93<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "93-енә"
    94<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "94-енә"
    95<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "95-енә"
    96<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "96-сына"
    97<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "97-сенә"
    98<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "98-енә"
    99<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "99-ына"
    100<num><subst><px3sp><dat> : "100-енә"
